Utah statutes.
70A-9a-507.   Effect of certain events on effectiveness of financing
statement.
(1)  A filed financing statement remains effective with respect to collateral
that is sold, exchanged, leased, licensed, or otherwise disposed of and in
which a security interest or agricultural lien continues, even if the secured
party knows of or consents to the disposition.
(2)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (3) and Section 70A-9a-508, a
financing statement is not rendered ineffective if, after the financing
statement is filed, the information provided in the financing statement
becomes seriously misleading under Section 70A-9a-506.
(3)  If a debtor so changes its name that a filed financing statement becomes
seriously misleading under Section 70A-9a-506:
(a)  the financing statement is effective to perfect a security interest in
collateral acquired by the debtor before, or within four months after, the
change; and
(b)  the financing statement is not effective to perfect a security interest
in collateral acquired by the debtor more than four months after the change,
unless an amendment to the financing statement which renders the financing
statement not seriously misleading is filed within four months after the
change.
